Louisiana, session 2026, SB512.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1289.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1289.2. Automobile insurance policies; mandatory right to appraisal
A. All automobile insurance polices issued in this state shall include a
right to appraisal clause, allowing policyholders to resolve disputes over claim
valuations through an independent appraisal process.
B. The right to appraisal process shall consist of all the following:
(1) One appraiser chosen by the insurer.
(2) One appraiser chosen by the policyholder.
(3) One neutral umpire.
C. The right to appraisal process shall follow the processes provided in
R.S. 22:1807.13 and 1807.19.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1507 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 512